Washington statutes.
RCW 4.92.005

"Volunteer"—Definition.

For the purposes of RCW 4.92.060, 4.92.070, 4.92.130, * 4.92.140, and 4.92.150, volunteer is defined in RCW 51.12.035.

[ 1985 c 217 s 6.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 4.92.140 was repealed by 1989 c 419 s 18, effective July 1, 1989.